Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.11
Child-occupied facility, defined.

Child-occupied facility means a building or portion of a building, constructed prior to 1978, visited regularly by the same child six years of age or under, on at least two different days within any seven-day period running from Sunday through Saturday, if each daily visit lasts at least three hours, the combined weekly visits last at least six hours, and the combined annual visits last at least sixty hours. Child-occupied facility may include, but is not limited to, a day-care center, a preschool, or a kindergarten classroom.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 13.